Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5651.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 14-1-6.1 and 14-1-64 of the General Laws in Chapter 14-1 entitled
"Proceedings in Family Court" are hereby amended to read as follows:
14-1-6.1. Records.
(a) In any case where a court shall have obtained jurisdiction of a juvenile having attained
the age of seventeen (17) years pursuant to 2007 P.L. 73, Article 22, section 1:
(i) All police records relating to the arrest, detention, apprehension and disposition of the
juvenile and all records of identification maintained pursuant to chapter 12-1 of the general laws
shall be treated as family court records in accordance with §§ 14-1-64 and 38-2-2 of the general
laws; provided, however, that no person and no department, agency or any other instrumentality of
the state or of any subdivision thereof shall be held liable or otherwise legally accountable for
having disclosed or disseminated any such records in reasonable reliance upon the law in effect
between July 1, 2007, and the effective date of this act [November 8, 2007]; and provided, further,
that there shall be an exception allowing for the disclosure of juvenile records in conducting a NICS
firearm background check until such time as the juvenile’s twenty-first birthday and provided
further that nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit the use of witness statements and
other police records in the course of judicial proceedings initiated prior to the effective date of this
act; and
(ii) All court records of such proceedings shall be sealed upon final disposition of the case

or upon the individual attaining the age of twenty-one (21) in the event of a no information,
dismissal or not guilty finding or upon the completion of any sentence, probation and/or parole
imposed therein.
14-1-64. Disposition of juvenile records.
(a) All police records relating to the arrest, detention, apprehension, and disposition of any
juveniles shall be kept in files separate and apart from the arrest records of adults and shall be
withheld from public inspection, but the police report relating to the arrest or detention of a juvenile
shall be open to inspection and copying upon request and upon payment of copying costs in
accordance with § 38-2-4 by the parent, guardian, or attorney of the juvenile involved. After
disposition of an offense and upon execution of an appropriate release and upon payment of
copying costs in accordance with § 38-2-4 by the parent, guardian or attorney of the juvenile
involved, records relating to the arrest, detention, apprehension and disposition of the juveniles
shall be open to inspection and copying by the parent, guardian, or attorney of the juvenile involved.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the identity of any juvenile waived
pursuant to § 14-1-7.1 or certified and convicted pursuant to § 14-1-7.2 shall be made public.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, there shall be an exception allowing for
the disclosure of juvenile records in conducting a NICS firearm background check and/or in
determining whether the individual meets federal disqualification criteria under 18 U.S.C. §922(g).
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001834
========
LC001834 - Page 2 of 3